Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Article 3. Prohibited Conduct Regarding Contracts.

§ 30-104.
Application.

This article proscribes certain conduct relating to contracts.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.34; 2001, c. 844.

§ 30-105.
Prohibited contracts by legislators.

No legislator shall have a personal interest in a contract with the legislative branch of state government.

No legislator shall have a personal interest in a contract with any governmental agency of the executive or judicial branches of state government, other than in a contract of regular employment, unless such contract is awarded as a result of competitive sealed bidding or competitive negotiation as set forth in §

2.2-4302.1

or

2.2-4302.2

or is exempted from competitive sealed bidding or competitive negotiation pursuant to §

2.2-4344

.

No legislator shall have a personal interest in a contract with any governmental agency of local government, other than in a contract of regular employment, unless such contract is (i) awarded as a result of competitive sealed bidding or competitive negotiation as set forth in §

2.2-4302.1

or

2.2-4302.2

or is awarded as a result of a procedure embodying competitive principles as authorized by subdivision A 10 or A 11 of §

2.2-4343

; (ii) exempted from competitive sealed bidding, competitive negotiation, or a procedure embodying competitive principles pursuant to §

2.2-4344

; or (iii) awarded after a finding, in writing, by the administrative head of the local governmental agency that competitive bidding or negotiation is contrary to the best interest of the public.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to contracts for the sale by a governmental agency of services or goods at uniform prices available to the general public.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a legislator’s personal interest in a contract between a public institution of higher education in the Commonwealth and a publisher or wholesaler of textbooks or other educational materials for students, which accrues to him solely because he has authored or otherwise created such textbooks or materials.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.35; 2001, c. 844; 2013, c. 583; 2017, cc. 829, 832.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “public institution of higher education in the Commonwealth” was substituted for “public institution of higher education in Virginia” in subsection E to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 583, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “set forth in §

2.2-4302.1

or

2.2-4302.2

” for “defined in §

2.2-4301

” in subsections B and C.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 829 and 832 are identical, and inserted “or is exempted from competitive sealed bidding or competitive negotiation pursuant to §

2.2-4344

” in subsection B and in subsection C, inserted clause (ii), redesignated former (ii) as (iii), and made a minor stylistic change.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Are subject to all applicable provisions of the General Assembly Conflicts Act in their service on the Commission. However, the only transactions for which this Act requires disqualification are transactions with the General Assembly. Thus, the General Assembly Conflicts Act will not come into play for transactions of the Commission, and it will not require any legislator to disqualify himself from transactions of the Commission. A legislator does remain subject to State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act in his capacity as a member of the Commission, and if Act requires him to disqualify himself from a transaction, the savings clause would apply. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 14-076,
(2/6/15).

§ 30-106.
Further exceptions.

The provisions of § 30-105 shall not apply to:

The sale, lease or exchange of real property between a legislator and a governmental agency, provided the legislator does not participate in any way as a legislator in such sale, lease or exchange, and this fact is set forth as a matter of public record by the governing body of the governmental agency or by the administrative head thereof. The legislator shall disclose any lease with a state governmental agency in his statement of economic interests as provided in § 30-111;

The publication of official notices;

A legislator whose sole personal interest in a contract with an agency of the legislative branch is by reason of income from the contracting firm or General Assembly in excess of $5,000 per year, provided the legislator or member of his immediate family does not participate and has no authority to participate in the procurement or letting of the contract on behalf of the contracting firm and the legislator either does not have authority to participate in the procurement or letting of the contract on behalf of the agency or he disqualifies himself as a matter of public record and does not participate on behalf of the agency in negotiating the contract or in approving the contract;

Contracts between a legislator’s governmental agency and a public service corporation, financial institution, or company furnishing public utilities in which the legislator has a personal interest, provided he disqualifies himself as a matter of public record and does not participate on behalf of the agency in negotiating the contract or in approving the contract;

Contracts for the purchase of goods or services when the contract does not exceed $500; or

Grants or other payments under any program wherein uniform rates for, or the amounts paid to, all qualified applicants are established solely by the administering governmental agency.

Neither the provisions of this chapter nor, unless expressly provided otherwise, any amendments thereto shall apply to those employment contracts or renewals thereof or to any other contracts entered into prior to August 1, 1987, which were in compliance with either the former Virginia Conflict of Interests Act, Chapter 22 (§ 2.1-347 et seq.) or the former Comprehensive Conflict of Interests Act, Chapter 40 (§ 2.1-599 et seq.) of Title 2.1 at the time of their formation and thereafter. Those contracts shall continue to be governed by the provisions of the appropriate prior Act. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (f)(4) of former § 2.1-348 of Chapter 22 of Title 2.1 in effect prior to July 1, 1983, the employment by the same governmental agency of a legislator and spouse or any other relative residing in the same household shall not be deemed to create a material financial interest except when one of such persons is employed in a direct supervisory or administrative position, or both, with respect to such spouse or other relative residing in his household, and the annual salary of such subordinate is $15,000 or more.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.36; 1994, c. 735; 2001, c. 844; 2017, cc. 829, 832.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 829 and 832 are identical, and substituted “$5,000” for “$10,000” in subdivision A 3.